Utah statutes.
10-6-159.   Financial administration ordinance -- Provisions.
The financial administration ordinances adopted pursuant to Section 10-6-158
shall provide for the following:
(1)  a maximum sum over which all purchases may not be made without the
approval of the mayor in the council-mayor optional form of government or the
governing body in other cities; however, this section shall not prevent the
mayor in the council-mayor optional form of government or the governing body
in other cities from approving all or part of a list of verified claims,
including a specific claim in an amount in excess of the stated maximum, where
certified by the appropriate financial officer or officers of the city;
(2)  that the financial officer be bonded for a reasonable amount; and
(3)  such other provisions as the governing body may deem advisable.
